Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-301
Compounding a felony, defined; penalty.

(1) A person is guilty of compounding a felony if he accepts or agrees to accept any pecuniary benefit or other reward or promise thereof, as consideration for:

(a) Refraining from seeking prosecution of an offender; or

(b) Refraining from reporting to law enforcement authorities the commission of any felony or information relating to a felony.

(2) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the benefit received by the defendant did not exceed an amount which the defendant reasonably believed to be due him as restitution for harm caused by the crime.

(3) Compounding is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 16.